North Carolina, session 2025, HB936.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 4 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 4.
"Telephone Solicitations.
"§ 75-100. Findings.
…
"§ 75-101. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Affiliate. – A business establishment, business, or other legal entity that
wholly or substantially owns, is wholly or substantially owned by, or is under
common ownership with a telephone solicitor.
(2) Automatic dialing and recorded message player. – Any automatic equipment
that incorporates a storage capability of telephone numbers to be called or a
random or a sequential number generator capable of producing numbers to be
called that, working alone or in conjunction with other equipment,
disseminates a prerecorded message to the telephone number called.
(3) "Do Not Call" Registry. – The registry created and maintained by the Federal
Trade Commission pursuant to the Telemarketing Sales Rule. It also means
any other telemarketing registry created by the federal government, including
the Federal Communications Commission. It also means any registry created
by the Attorney General pursuant to G.S. 75-102(n).
(4) Doing business in this State. – To make or cause to be made any telephone
solicitation to North Carolina telephone subscribers, whether the telephone
solicitations are made from a location inside North Carolina or outside North
Carolina.
(5) Established business relationship. – A relationship between a seller and a
consumer based on:
a. The consumer's purchase, rental, or lease of the seller's goods or
services or a financial transaction between the consumer and the seller
*H936-v-5*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or one or more of its affiliates within the 18 months immediately
preceding the date of a telephone solicitation; or
b. The consumer's inquiry or application regarding a product or service
offered by the seller within the three months immediately preceding
the date of a telephone solicitation.
(6) Express invitation or permission. – Any invitation or permission that is
registered by the telephone subscriber on an independent form and that
contains the telephone number to which calls can be placed and the signature
of the telephone subscriber. The form may be completed and signed
electronically.
(7) Person. – Any individual, business establishment, business, or other legal
entity.
(7a) Prior express written consent. – An agreement that satisfies all of the
following conditions:
a. It is in writing.
b. It bears the signature of the person called that clearly authorizes the
seller to deliver or cause to be delivered to the person called telephone
solicitations. The term "signature" includes an electronic or digital
form of signature, to the extent that such form of signature is
recognized as a valid signature under applicable federal law or State
law.
c. It includes the telephone number to which the signatory authorizes
such telephone solicitations to be delivered.
d. It includes a clear and conspicuous disclosure informing the person
signing both of the following:
1. By executing the agreement, such person authorizes the seller
to deliver or cause to be delivered to the signatory telephone
solicitations.
2. The person is not required to sign the agreement (directly or
indirectly) or agree to enter into such an agreement as a
condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services.
(7b) Robocall. – A voice communication that delivers artificial, artificially
generated, or prerecorded voice messages, in whole or in part, including, but
not limited to, telephone calls utilizing soundboard technology and ringless
voicemail messages. "Robocall" also includes spam and scam text messages
received by a telephone subscriber through a messaging application. The
following are not considered a "robocall": (i) a voice communication made
with the prior express written consent of the telephone subscriber that delivers
artificial, artificially generated, or prerecorded voice messages, in whole or in
part, including, but not limited to, telephone calls utilizing soundboard
technology and ringless voicemail messages, and (ii) text messages sent with
the prior express written consent of the telephone subscriber received by a
telephone subscriber through a messaging application.
(7c) Robocaller. – Any person doing business in this State that, directly or through
others, makes, attempts to make, causes to be made, or otherwise provides or
knows or consciously avoids knowing that they provide substantial assistance
or support for making robocalls.
(8) Telemarketing Sales Rule. – The federal regulation promulgated by the
Federal Trade Commission, 16 C.F.R. Part 310 (January 29, 2003 Edition), as
amended, to implement the Telemarketing and Consumer Fraud and Abuse
Prevention Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6101-6108, as amended.
Page 2 House Bill 936-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Telephone solicitation. – A voice or text communication, whether
prerecorded, live, or a facsimile, over a telephone line or wireless telephone
network or via a commercial mobile radio service that is made by a telephone
solicitor to a telephone subscriber for the purpose of soliciting or encouraging
the purchase or rental of, or investment in, property, goods, or services;
obtaining or providing information that will or may be used for that purpose;
soliciting or encouraging a telephone subscriber's participation in any contest,
sweepstakes, raffle, or lottery, whether legal or illegal; or obtaining a
charitable donation. "Telephone solicitation" also includes those transactions
that are defined as "telemarketing" under the Telemarketing Sales Rule.
(10) Telephone solicitor. – Any individual, business establishment, business, or
other legal entity person doing business in this State that, directly or through
salespersons or agents, makes or makes, attempts to make make, causes to be
made, or otherwise provides or knows or consciously avoids knowing that
they provide substantial assistance or support for making telephone
solicitations or causes telephone solicitations to be made. solicitations.
"Telephone solicitor" also includes any party defined as a "telemarketer"
under the Telemarketing Sales Rule.
(11) Telephone subscriber. – An individual who subscribes to a residential
telephone service from a local exchange company, a competing local provider
certified to do business in North Carolina, or a wireless telephone company;
or the individuals living or residing with that individual.
(12) Unsolicited telephone call. – A voice or text communication, whether
prerecorded, live, or a facsimile, over a telephone line or wireless telephone
network or via a commercial mobile radio service that is made by a person to
a telephone subscriber without prior express invitation or permission.
"§ 75-102. Restrictions on telephone solicitations.
…
(f) No telephone solicitor shall make a telephone solicitation before 8:00 A.M. or after
9:00 P.M.
…
(h) No telephone solicitor or robocaller shall engage in threats, intimidation, or the use
of profane or obscene language.
(i) No telephone solicitor shall cause misleading information to be transmitted to users
of caller identification technologies or otherwise block or misrepresent the origin of the telephone
solicitation. No provider of telephone caller identification services shall be held liable for
violations of this subsection committed by other individuals or entities. It is not a violation of
this subsection for a telephone solicitor to utilize the name and number of the entity the
solicitation is being made on behalf of rather than the name and number of the telephone solicitor.
…
(k) Nothing in this section prohibits a telephone solicitor from contacting by
nontelephonic notice a telephone subscriber whose telephone number appears in the "Do Not
Call" Registry to obtain the telephone subscriber's express invitation or permission prior express
written consent allowing the telephone solicitor to make telephone solicitations to the telephone
subscriber. A telephone solicitor shall not contact a telephone subscriber by telephone to obtain
this express invitation or permission.prior express written consent.
(l) Nothing in this section prohibits a telephone solicitor from advertising in a general
medium or contacting by nontelephonic notice a telephone subscriber whose telephone number
appears in the "Do Not Call" Registry to encourage the telephone subscriber to initiate telephone
calls to the telephone solicitor. A telephone solicitor shall not contact a telephone subscriber by
telephone to obtain this express invitation or permission.prior express written consent.
House Bill 936-Fifth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
"§ 75-103. Limited exceptions.
(a) G.S. 75-102(a) does not apply to any of the following telephone solicitations that are
made:
(1) To any telephone subscriber with the telephone subscriber's prior express
invitation or permission.prior express written consent.
…
(e) In any dispute regarding whether a telephone subscriber has provided an express
invitation or permission prior express written consent under subsection (a) of this section, the
telephone solicitor has the burden of proving that the telephone subscriber has provided this
permission consent by producing the original document, a facsimile document, or an electronic
form, signed by the telephone subscriber, or other authentication that evidences permission.
consent. A telephone subscriber may subsequently retract express invitation or permission prior
express written consent by indicating a desire not to receive further telephone solicitations under
G.S. 75-102(b).
"§ 75-104. Restrictions on use of automatic dialing and recorded message players.robocalls.
(a) Except as provided in this section, no person may use an automatic dialing and
recorded message player to make an unsolicited telephone call.make a robocall to a telephone
number.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a person may use an automatic dialing
and recorded message player to make an unsolicited telephone call make a robocall only under
one or more of the following circumstances:
(1) All of the following are satisfied:
a. The person making the call robocall is any of the following:
1. A tax-exempt charitable or civic organization.
2. A political party or political candidate.
3. A governmental official.
4. An opinion polling organization, radio station, television
station, cable television company, or broadcast rating service
conducting a public opinion poll.
b. No part of the call robocall is used to make a telephone solicitation.
c. The person making the call robocall clearly identifies the person's
name and contact information and the nature of the unsolicited
telephone call.robocall.
(2) Prior to the playing of the recorded message, robocall, a live operator complies
with G.S. 75-102(c), states the nature and length in minutes of the recorded
message, and asks for and receives prior approval to play the recorded
message from the person receiving the call.
(3) The unsolicited telephone call robocall is in connection with an existing debt
or contract for which payment or performance has not been completed at the
time of the unsolicited telephone call, robocall, and both of the following are
satisfied:
a. No part of the call robocall is used to make a telephone solicitation.
b. The person making the call robocall clearly identifies the person's
name and contact information and the nature of the unsolicited
telephone call.robocall.
(4) The unsolicited telephone call robocall is placed by a person with whom the
telephone subscriber has made an appointment, provided that the call robocall
is conveying information only about the appointment, or by a utility, telephone
company, cable television company, satellite television company, or similar
entity for the sole purpose of conveying information or news about network
Page 4 House Bill 936-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
outages, repairs or service interruptions, and confirmation calls robocalls
related to restoration of service, and both of the following are satisfied:
a. No part of the call robocall is used to make a telephone solicitation.
b. The person making the call robocall clearly identifies the person's
name and contact information and the nature of the unsolicited
telephone call.robocall.
(5) The person plays the recorded message robocall in order to comply with
section 16 C.F.R. Part 310.4(b)(4) of the Telemarketing Sales Rule.
(6) The unsolicited telephone call robocall is placed by, or on behalf of, a health
insurer as defined in G.S. 58-51-115(a)(2) from whom the telephone
subscriber or other covered family member of the health insurer receives
health care coverage or the administration of such coverage, provided that the
call robocall is conveying information related to the telephone subscriber or
family member's health care, preventive services, medication or other covered
benefits, and both of the following are satisfied:
a. No part of the call robocall is used to make a telephone solicitation.
b. The person making the call robocall clearly identifies the person's
name and contact information and the nature of the unsolicited
telephone call.robocall.
(7) No part of the call robocall is used to make a telephone solicitation, the person
making the call robocall clearly identifies the person's contact information and
the nature of the unsolicited telephone call, robocall, and the sole purpose of
the unsolicited telephone call robocall is to protect the public health, safety,
or welfare, by informing the telephone subscriber of any of the following:
a. That the telephone subscriber has purchased a product that is subject
to a recall by the product's manufacturer, distributor or retailer, or by
the federal Consumer Product Safety Commission or another
government agency or department with legal authority to recall the
product which is the subject of the call, robocall, due to safety or health
concerns, provided that (i) there is a reasonable basis to believe that
the telephone subscriber has purchased the product, and (ii) the
message complies with any requirements imposed by any government
agency instituting the recall.
b. That the telephone subscriber may have received a prescription or
over-the-counter medication that is subject to a recall by the product's
manufacturer, distributor or retailer, or by the federal Food and Drug
Administration or another government agency or department with
legal authority to recall the product which is the subject of the call,
robocall, due to safety or health concerns, provided that (i) the call
robocall and its message comply with the requirements of the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (P.L. 104-191) (HIPAA)
and any corresponding regulations pertaining to privacy, (ii) there is a
reasonable basis to believe that the telephone subscriber has purchased
or received the medication, and (iii) the message complies with any
requirements imposed by the government agency or product
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer instituting the recall.
c. That the telephone subscriber has not picked up a filled prescription
drug for which a valid prescription is on file with a pharmacy licensed
pursuant to G.S. 90-85.21 and the telephone subscriber requested that
the prescription be filled, provided that the call robocall and its
message comply with the requirements of the Health Insurance
House Bill 936-Fifth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Portability and Accountability Act (P.L. 104-191) (HIPAA) and any
corresponding regulations pertaining to privacy.
(8) The call robocall is generated from a court proceeding notification system
established by the Administrative Office of the Courts.
"§ 75-104A. Restrictions on spoofing and impersonating government officials.
(a) No telephone solicitor or robocaller shall cause misleading information to be
transmitted to users of caller identification technologies or otherwise block or misrepresent the
origin of a telephone solicitation or robocall with the intent to defraud, confuse, cause harm, or
wrongfully obtain anything of value, including, but not limited to, personal information. No
provider of telephone caller identification services shall be held liable for violations of this
subsection committed by other individuals or entities. It is not a violation of this subsection for a
telephone solicitor to utilize the name and number of the entity the solicitation is being made on
behalf of rather than the name and number of the telephone solicitor.
(b) No telephone solicitor or robocaller shall impersonate any federal, State, or local
government official, law enforcement professional, or government agency in order to defraud,
confuse, or financially or otherwise injure the telephone subscriber or in order to obtain personal
information from the telephone subscriber that may be used in a fraudulent or unlawful manner.
"§ 75-105. Enforcement.
(a) The Attorney General may investigate any complaints received alleging violation of
this Article. If the Attorney General finds that there has been a violation of this Article, the
Attorney General may bring an action to impose civil penalties and to seek any other appropriate
relief pursuant to this Chapter, including equitable relief to restrain the violation. If the Attorney
General brings an action on behalf of telephone subscribers pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, the Attorney General may not seek treble damages on behalf of telephone subscribers
pursuant to G.S. 75-16. Actions for civil penalties under this section shall be consistent with the
provisions of this Chapter except that the penalty imposed for a violation of this Article shall be
either of the following:
(1) Five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first violation, one thousand dollars
($1,000) for the second violation, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the
third and any other violation that occurs within two years of the first violation.
(2) One hundred dollars ($100.00) for each violation within two years of the first
violation, if the solicitor or robocaller can show that the violations are the
result of a mistake and the telephone solicitor or robocaller either made the
telephone solicitation or robocall under G.S. 75-103(a)(1), (2), (3), (4), and
(5), or can show that the telephone solicitor complied with G.S. 75-102(d).
This subsection does not apply if the telephone solicitor or robocaller violated
G.S. 75-104A.
If a single call violates multiple provisions of this Article, penalties shall be assessed for each
violation of the provisions of this Article caused by that call.
(a1) There is a rebuttable presumption that a telephone subscriber with a North Carolina
area code is a North Carolina resident or in North Carolina at the time a telephone solicitation or
robocall is made.
(b) A telephone subscriber who has received a robocall or a telephone solicitation from
or on behalf of a telephone solicitor or robocaller in violation of this Article may bring any of the
following actions in civil court:
(1) An action to enjoin further violations of this Article by the telephone
solicitor.solicitor or robocaller.
(2) An action to recover five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first violation, one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second violation, and five thousand dollars
($5,000) for the third and any other violation that occurs within two years of
the first violation.
Page 6 House Bill 936-Fifth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
If a single call violates multiple provisions of this Article, penalties shall be assessed for each
violation of the provisions of this Article caused by that call.
(c) No action may be brought under subsection (b) of this section if the violations are a
result of mistake and the telephone solicitor either made the telephone solicitation under
G.S. 75-103(a)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5), or can show that the telephone solicitor complied with
G.S. 75-102(d). An action may be brought under subsection (b) of this section if the telephone
solicitor or robocaller violated G.S. 75-104A.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 75-115(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Unsolicited advertisement. – Any material advertising the commercial
availability or quality of any property, goods, or services that is transmitted to
any person or entity without that person's or entity's prior express invitation
or permission. prior express written consent. Prior express invitation or
permission may be obtained for a specific or unlimited number of
advertisements and may be obtained for a specific or unlimited period of
time.written consent may be obtained in accordance with G.S. 75-101."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies, for causes of
action, to telephone solicitations in violation of this act occurring on or after that date.
House Bill 936-Fifth Edition Page 7